Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-633
Payment cards; prohibited acts; violation; penalty.

(1) A person that accepts a payment card for the transaction of business shall print no more than the last five digits of the payment card account number upon any receipt provided to the payment card holder.

(2) This section applies only to receipts that are electronically printed and does not apply to any transaction in which the only means of recording the payment card number is by handwriting or by an imprint or copy of the payment card.

(3) A violation of this section is a Class III misdemeanor for the first offense and a Class I misdemeanor for a second or subsequent offense.

(4)(a) This section becomes operative on January 1, 2004, with respect to any cash register or other machine or device that electronically prints receipts for payment card transactions and that is originally put into use on or after January 1, 2004.

(b) This section becomes operative on January 1, 2007, with respect to any cash register or other machine or device that electronically prints receipts for payment card transactions and that is originally put into use before January 1, 2004.

Laws 2002, LB 276, § 5.